src/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;


LEXICON ab

+ABBR:%. # ;

! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------

! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON ITRAB

Ltd ab ;

! =============================================== !
!    Abbreviations transitive in front of numeral !
! =============================================== !


LEXICON TRNUMAB

nr ab ;

! =============================================== !
!            Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !


LEXICON TRAB

mrs	 ab ;
mr	 ab ;
prof ab ;
dr	 ab ;
